ubuntu.slaves.black/1/packages/xuxen-eu-spell/src/hunspell/eu-ES.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1 Y 749
SFX 1    0       araz      .
SFX 1    0       arazi      .
SFX 1    0       arazte      .
SFX 1    0       araztear      .
SFX 1    0       arazteke      .
SFX 1    0       arazten/238      .
SFX 1    0       tu      .
SFX 1    0       tua      .
SFX 1    0       tuago/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuak      .
SFX 1    0       tuarekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuarekiko/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuarendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuarentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuarentzako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuaren/238      .
SFX 1    0       tuarena      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenak      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenarekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenarendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenarentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenari      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenei      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenek      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenetaraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenetarantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenetarat      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenetara      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenetatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenetan      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenetarik      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenez      .
SFX 1    0       tuarengan      .
SFX 1    0       tuarengana      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenganaino      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenganantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuarengandik      .
SFX 1    0       tuarengatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenoi      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenok      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenokin      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenontzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenotaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenoz      .
SFX 1    0       tuareni      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenik      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenean      .
SFX 1    0       tuareneraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenerantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenerat      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenera      .
SFX 1    0       tuarenetik      .
SFX 1    0       tuari      .
SFX 1    0       tuaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuagan      .
SFX 1    0       tuagana      .
SFX 1    0       tuaganaino      .
SFX 1    0       tuaganantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuagandik      .
SFX 1    0       tuagatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuegi      .
SFX 1    0       tuegia      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiak      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiarekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiarendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiarentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiaren/238      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiari      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiei      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiek      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuegientzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuegietako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuegietaraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuegietarantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuegietarat      .
SFX 1    0       tuegietara      .
SFX 1    0       tuegietatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuegietan      .
SFX 1    0       tuegietarik      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiez      .
SFX 1    0       tuegien/238      .
SFX 1    0       tuegigatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuegioi      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiok      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiokin      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiontzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiotaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuegioz      .
SFX 1    0       tuegion      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuegik      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitaraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitarantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitarat      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitara      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitan      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitarik      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiz      .
SFX 1    0       tuegirekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuegirendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuegirentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiren/238      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiri      .
SFX 1    0       tuegirik      .
SFX 1    0       tuegian      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiko/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuegiraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuegirantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuegirat      .
SFX 1    0       tuegira      .
SFX 1    0       tuegitik      .
SFX 1    0       tuei      .
SFX 1    0       tuek      .
SFX 1    0       tuekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuekiko/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuen/238      .
SFX 1    0       tuendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuentzako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuena      .
SFX 1    0       tuenak      .
SFX 1    0       tuenarekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuenarendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuenarentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuenaren/238      .
SFX 1    0       tuenari      .
SFX 1    0       tuenaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuenei      .
SFX 1    0       tuenek      .
SFX 1    0       tuenekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuenendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuenentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetaraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetarantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetarat      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetara      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetan      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetarik      .
SFX 1    0       tuenez      .
SFX 1    0       tuenen/238      .
SFX 1    0       tuengatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuenoi      .
SFX 1    0       tuenok      .
SFX 1    0       tuenokin      .
SFX 1    0       tuenontzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuenotaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuenoz      .
SFX 1    0       tuenon      .
SFX 1    0       tueni      .
SFX 1    0       tuenik      .
SFX 1    0       tuenean      .
SFX 1    0       tueneko/243      .
SFX 1    0       tueneraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuenerantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuenerat      .
SFX 1    0       tuenera      .
SFX 1    0       tuenetik      .
SFX 1    0       tuetako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuetaraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuetarantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuetarat      .
SFX 1    0       tuetara      .
SFX 1    0       tuetatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuetan      .
SFX 1    0       tuetarik      .
SFX 1    0       tuez      .
SFX 1    0       tuengan      .
SFX 1    0       tuengana      .
SFX 1    0       tuenganaino      .
SFX 1    0       tuenganantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuengandik      .
SFX 1    0       tugatik      .
SFX 1    0       tugatiko/243      .
SFX 1    0       tukeran      .
SFX 1    0       tuko/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuoi      .
SFX 1    0       tuok      .
SFX 1    0       tuokin      .
SFX 1    0       tuokiko/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuontzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuontzako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuotaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuotako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuotaraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuotarantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuotarat      .
SFX 1    0       tuotara      .
SFX 1    0       tuotatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuotan      .
SFX 1    0       tuotarik      .
SFX 1    0       tuoz      .
SFX 1    0       tuon      .
SFX 1    0       tuona      .
SFX 1    0       tuonak      .
SFX 1    0       tuonarekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuonarendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuonarentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuonari      .
SFX 1    0       tuonaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuonei      .
SFX 1    0       tuonek      .
SFX 1    0       tuonekin      .
SFX 1    0       tuonendako/243      .
SFX 1    0       tuonentzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuonez      .
SFX 1    0       tuongan      .
SFX 1    0       tuongana      .
SFX 1    0       tuonganaino      .
SFX 1    0       tuonganantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuongandik      .
SFX 1    0       tuongatik      .
SFX 1    0       tuonoi      .
SFX 1    0       tuonok      .
SFX 1    0       tuonokin      .
SFX 1    0       tuonontzat      .
SFX 1    0       tuonotaz      .
SFX 1    0       tuonoz      .
SFX 1    0       tuoni      .
SFX 1    0       tuonik      .
SFX 1    0       tuonean      .
SFX 1    0       tuoneraino      .
SFX 1    0       tuonerantz      .
SFX 1    0       tuonerat      .
